Vermont, session 2025-2026, H505.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. CHARTER AMENDMENT APPROVAL
The General Assembly approves the amendment of the charter of the Town
of Barre as set forth in this act. Voters approved the proposals of amendment
on May 14, 2024.
Sec. 2. 24 App. V.S.A. chapter 101 is amended to read:
CHAPTER 101. TOWN OF BARRE
* * *
§ 10. ELECTED OFFICERS; GENERAL
(a) The following officers shall be elected by the legal voters of the Town
of Barre and voting for the officers shall be by Australian ballot:
* * *
(2) three auditors; [Repealed.]
(3) one Clerk; and
(4) one Moderator.
* * *
(f) The Office of Auditor may be abolished and replaced by an annual
financial audit of all funds of the Town by a public accountant, licensed in
Vermont, provided the voters authorize the actions at any annual or special
Town meeting. The vote to eliminate the Office of Auditor shall remain in
VT LEG #384130 v.1

No. M-4 Page 2 of 3
2025
effect until rescinded by majority vote of the legal voters present and voting at
an annual or special meeting duly warned for that purpose. Unless otherwise
provided by law, the Selectboard shall provide for all other auditor duties to be
performed. The term of office of any auditor in the office on the date the Town
votes to eliminate that office shall expire on the 45th day after the vote or on
the date that the Selectboard enters into a contract with a public accountant
under this section, whichever occurs first. [Repealed.]
* * *
§ 39. COMPENSATION AND FEES
(a) The Town election shall annually vote the compensation to be paid to
the following officers:
* * *
(2) Auditors; [Repealed.]
* * *
(b) The Selectboard shall annually consider and from time to time shall set
the compensation of the following officers:
* * *
(7) Board of Abatement; and
* * *
(d) All fees prescribed by State law, charter, ordinance, or otherwise shall
be collected for the benefit of the Town and paid to the Town Treasurer. No
VT LEG #384130 v.1

No. M-4 Page 3 of 3
2025
fees shall be used directly by any receiving officer or enure inure directly to
the officer.
* * *
Sec. 3. REPEAL
24 App. V.S.A. chapter 101, § 12 (Town of Barre; Auditors) is repealed.
Sec. 4. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage.
Date Governor signed bill: June 2, 2025
VT LEG #384130 v.1